District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0456.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Private Vehicle-for-Hire Operator Clarification Temporary Amendment
Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 4(16C) of the Department of For-Hire Vehicles Establishment Act of
1985, effective March 25, 1986 (D.C. Law 6-97; D.C. Official Code § 50-301.03(16C)), is
amended to read as follows:
“(16C) “Private vehicle-for-hire operator” means an individual who utilizes the
digital dispatch of a private vehicle-for-hire company to operate a motor vehicle to provide
transportation to passengers.”.
Sec. 3. Applicability.
This act shall apply as of March 1, 2024.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
(a) This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional
review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
1

December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2